Missouri, session 2026, SB1685.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.805, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 144.805,
to read as follows:
144.805. 1. In addition to the exemptions granted
pursuant to the provisions of section 144.030, there shall
also be specifically exempted from the provisions of
sections 144.010 to 144.525, sections 144.600 to 144.746,
and section 238.235, and the provisions of any local sales
tax law, as defined in section 32.085, and from the
computation of the tax levied, assessed or payable pursuant
to sections 144.010 to 144.525, sections 144.600 to 144.746,
and section 238.235, and the provisions of any local sales
tax law, as defined in section 32.085, all sales of aviation
jet fuel in a given calendar year to common carriers engaged
in the interstate air transportation of passengers and
cargo, and the storage, use and consumption of such aviation
jet fuel by such common carriers, if such common carrier has
first paid to the state of Missouri, in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, state sales and use taxes
pursuant to the foregoing provisions and applicable to the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1685 2
purchase, storage, use or consumption of such aviation jet
fuel in a maximum and aggregate amount of one million five
hundred thousand dollars of state sales and use taxes in
such calendar year.
2. To qualify for the exemption prescribed in
subsection 1 of this section, the common carrier shall
furnish to the seller a certificate in writing to the effect
that an exemption pursuant to this section is applicable to
the aviation jet fuel so purchased, stored, used and
consumed. The director of revenue shall permit any such
common carrier to enter into a direct-pay agreement with the
department of revenue, pursuant to which such common carrier
may pay directly to the department of revenue any applicable
sales and use taxes on such aviation jet fuel up to the
maximum aggregate amount of one million five hundred
thousand dollars in each calendar year. The director of
revenue shall adopt appropriate rules and regulations to
implement the provisions of this section, and to permit
appropriate claims for refunds of any excess sales and use
taxes collected in calendar year 1993 or any subsequent year
with respect to any such common carrier and aviation jet
fuel.
3. The provisions of this section shall apply to all
purchases and deliveries of aviation jet fuel from and after
May 10, 1993.
4. All sales and use tax revenues upon aviation jet
fuel received pursuant to this chapter, less the amounts
specifically designated pursuant to the constitution or
pursuant to section 144.701 for other purposes, shall be
deposited to the credit of the aviation trust fund
established pursuant to section 155.090; provided however,
the amount of such state sales and use tax revenues

SB 1685 3
deposited to the credit of such aviation trust fund shall
not exceed ten million dollars in each calendar year.
5. The provisions of this section and section 144.807
shall expire on December 31, [2033] 2043.
✓